Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 3. Operations

§ 13-7-301.
Savings and investment accounts.

State savings and loan associations may accept savings and issue savings account books or investment certificates as evidence of savings and shall credit interest or pay interest in cash periodically at least annually, if earned. Savings and investment accounts are ownership accounts in the association and not creditor liabilities and shall bear interest at a rate prescribed by the directors of the association for the period. If a rate is not specified prior to any period then accounts shall receive the rate prevailing the previous period. Interest shall be payable only if available from current earnings or undivided profits.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 172, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-279.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Certificate of deposit as “security” under federal securities laws, 82 ALR Fed 553.

§ 13-7-302.
Accounts of minors; joint accounts.

Any association may accept the following accounts when provided by its bylaws:

Accounts in the name of any minor which shall be held for his exclusive right and benefit and free from the control or lien of all other persons. The accumulated savings together with the interest shall be paid to the person in whose name the account is held. The receipt of the minor releases the association for accumulated savings and dividends credited thereon;

An account in the name of two (2) or more persons is withdrawable by any one [1] of them and the receipt of any one [1] of the persons is a valid and sufficient release to the association for the withdrawals regardless of the death or disability of any other joint shareholder.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to deposits by minors in financial institutions, see §

2-1-203

.

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Common law relative to presumption favoring joint tenancies

has been modified by statute in this state. Choman v. Epperley, 592 P.2d 714,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of bank to joint depositor of savings account for amounts withdrawn by other joint depositor without presentation of passbook, 35 ALR4th 1094.

Liability of bank to joint depositor for removal of name from account at request of other joint depositor, 39 ALR4th 1112.

§ 13-7-303.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 68, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 13-7-304.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 172, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-279.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 68, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 13-7-305.
Right to redeem savings or investment accounts.

The association may redeem by lot or otherwise, as determined by the board of directors, any part of any of its savings or investment accounts on a dividend date by giving thirty (30) days’ notice by registered mail when funds are available for that purpose. An association shall not redeem any of its accounts when the association is in an impaired condition or when it has applications for withdrawal which have been on file more than thirty (30) days and have not been reached for payment. The redemption price of accounts redeemed shall be the full value of the account redeemed, as determined by the board of directors, but in no event shall the redemption price be less than the withdrawal value. If the notice of redemption has been duly given, and if on or before the redemption date the funds necessary for the redemption have been set aside to be available for the redemption, dividends upon the accounts called for redemption shall cease to accrue from and after the dividend date specified as the redemption date and all rights with respect to accounts shall terminate immediately after the redemption date, except only the right of the account holder of record to receive the redemption price without interest.

All account books or certificates evidencing accounts which have been validly called for redemption must be tendered for payment within ten (10) years from the date of redemption designated in the redemption notice otherwise they shall be cancelled and all claims of the account holders against the association are barred.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 172, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-279.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.